Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.340

May acquire property for park, recreational, viewpoint, greenbelt, conservation, historic, scenic, or view purposes.

Any county or city may acquire by purchase, gift, devise, bequest, grant or exchange, title to or any interests or rights in real property to be provided or preserved for (a) park or recreational purposes, viewpoint or greenbelt purposes, (b) the conservation of land or other natural resources, or (c) historic, scenic, or view purposes.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 76 s 4.]

NOTES:

Acquisition of interests in land for conservation, protection, preservation, or open space purposes by counties: RCW 64.04.130.

Historic preservation—Authority of county to acquire property: RCW 36.32.435.

Parks, county commissioners may designate name of: RCW 36.32.430.